Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Rules for Taking Custody of Property Presumed Abandoned

393A.150.
Address of apparent owner to establish priority.

In KRS

393A.150

to

393A.210

:

The last-known address of an apparent owner shall be any description, code, or other indication of the location of the apparent owner which identifies the state, even if the description, code, or indication of location shall not be sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner;

If the United States postal zip code associated with the apparent owner is for a post office located in this state, this state shall be deemed to be the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner unless other records associated with the apparent owner specifically identify the physical address of the apparent owner to be in another state;

If the address under subsection (2) of this section is in another state, the other state shall be deemed to be the state of the last-known address of the apparent owner; and

The address of the apparent owner of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract or its proceeds shall be presumed to be the address of the insured or annuitant if a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the amount owed under the policy or contract and the address of the other person is not known by the insurance company and cannot be determined under KRS

393A.160

.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 15, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.160.
Address of apparent owner in this state.

The administrator may take custody of property that is presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or a foreign country if:

The last-known address of the apparent owner in the records of the holder is in this state; or

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity or last-known address of the apparent owner, but the administrator has determined that the last-known address of the apparent owner is in this state.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 16, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.170.
If records show multiple addresses of apparent owner.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if records of a holder reflect multiple addresses for an apparent owner and this state is the state of the most recently recorded address, this state may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state or another state.

If it appears from records of the holder that the most recently recorded address of the apparent owner under subsection (1) of this section is a temporary address and this state is the state of the next most recently recorded address that is not a temporary address, this state may take custody of the property presumed abandoned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 17, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.180.
Holder domiciled in this state.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section or KRS

393A.160

or

393A.170

, the administrator may take custody of property presumed abandoned, whether located in this state, another state, or a foreign country, if the holder is domiciled in this state or is this state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of this state, and:

Another state or foreign country shall not be entitled to the property because there is no last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property in the records of the holder; or

The state or foreign country of the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property does not provide for custodial taking of the property.

Property shall not be subject to the custody of the administrator under subsection (1) of this section if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of this state or the state or foreign country of the last-known address of the apparent owner.

If a holder’s state of domicile has changed since the time property was presumed abandoned, the holder’s state of domicile in this section shall be deemed to be the state where the holder was domiciled at the time the property was presumed abandoned.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 18, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.190.
Custody if transaction took place in this state.

Except as in KRS

393A.160

,

393A.170

, or

393A.180

, the administrator may take custody of property presumed abandoned whether located in this state or another state if:

The transaction out of which the property arose took place in this state;

The holder is domiciled in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property, except that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state of the holder’s domicile, the property shall not be subject to the custody of the administrator; and

The last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is unknown or in a state that does not provide for the custodial taking of the property, except that if the property is specifically exempt from custodial taking under the law of the state of the last-known address, the property shall not be subject to the custody of the administrator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 19, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.200.
Traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument.

The administrator may take custody of sums payable on a traveler’s check, money order, or similar instrument presumed abandoned to the extent permissible under 12

U.S.C. secs. 2501

to 2503, as amended.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 20, effective July 14, 2018.

393A.210.
Burden of proof to establish administrator’s right to custody.

If the administrator asserts a right to custody of unclaimed property, the administrator has the burden to prove:

The existence and amount of the property;

The property shall be presumed abandoned; and

The property shall be subject to the custody of the administrator.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 163, § 21, effective July 14, 2018.